src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON SimpleVerbs
esile=tõusma+V:esile=t˘õusE7 NAERMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ette=ütlema+V:˘ette=˘üT1 ÜTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
heaks=kiitma+V:h˘eaks=k˘iitA7 SAATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hinge=matma+V:h˘inge=m˘aT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hinge=puistama+V:h˘inge=p˘uista TÜÜTAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hukkuma+V:h˘ukku SÜTTIMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
hädaohustama+V:häda#ohusta ELAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jaasõna=ütlema+V:j˘aa#sõna=˘üT1 ÜTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
julgema+V:j˘ulG1e JULGEMA  "weight: 6 " ; 
julgust=kaotama+V:j˘ulgust=k˘aota TAOTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
juukseid=seadma+V:j˘uukseid=s˘eaD1A7 NAERMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaasama+V:k˘aasa HAKKAMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
kaikuma+V:k˘aiku LEKKIMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
kaitsma+V:k˘aitsE7 KAITSMA  "weight: 6 " ; 
kaksiti=mõtlema+V:kaksiti=m˘õT1 ÜTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kasutütreks=võtma+V:kasu#t˘ütreks=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
katki=kiskuma+V:k˘atʲki=k˘isK1 KISKUMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keetma+V:k˘eetA7 SAATMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
kehtivust=kaotama+V:k˘ehtivust=k˘aota TAOTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kibelema+V:kibele RABELEMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
kidunema+V:kidune ELAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiirgama+V:k˘iirG1a TÜÜTAMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
kiiva=kiskuma+V:k˘iiva=k˘isK1 KISKUMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
klopsima+V:kl˘opsi LEPPIMA  "weight: 10 " ; 
kokku=seadma+V:k˘okku=s˘eaD1A7 NAERMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuselema+V:kusele RABELEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõmmutama+V:kõmmuta ELAMA  "weight: 10 " ; 
käitlema+V:k˘äitle HAKKAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
käskima+V:k˘äsʲK1 KÄSKIMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
kätte=võitma+V:k˘ätte=v˘õitA7 SAATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kütma+V:k˘üT1 KATMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
küüntega=kiskuma+V:k˘üüntega=k˘isK1 KISKUMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
laastama+V:l˘aasta LAASTAMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
lekkima+V:l˘ekki LEKKIMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
logelema+V:logele RABELEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lubadust=andma+V:lubadust=˘anD1A7 NAERMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
luustuma+V:l˘uustu ELAMA  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõmpsima+V:l˘õmpsi LEPPIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
maha=laitma+V:maha=l˘aitA7 SAATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
maitsma+V:m˘aitsE7 KAITSMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
meelemärkust=kaotama+V:meele#m˘ärkust=k˘aota TAOTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
muhelusele=kiskuma+V:muhelusele=k˘isK1 KISKUMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
mõtlema+V:m˘õT1 ÜTLEMA  "weight: 4 " ; 
määrama+V:m˘äära HAKKAMA  "weight: 5 " ; 
möönma+V:m˘öön VEENMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
naasma+V:n˘aas NAASMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
nõuks=võtma+V:n˘õuks=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
olelema+V:olele RABELEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
otsa=lõppema+V:˘otsa=l˘õppe LEKKIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pead=kaotama+V:p˘ead=k˘aota TAOTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
plätsima+V:pl˘ätʲsi LEPPIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
poolehoidu=võitma+V:p˘oole#h˘oidu=v˘õitA7 SAATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
poolnema+V:p˘oolne ELAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pumpama+V:p˘umpa HAKKAMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
pürgima+V:p˘ürG1i LEKKIMA  "weight: 8 " ; 
raadama+V:r˘aada TÜÜTAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
rappuma+V:r˘appu SÜTTIMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
riidu=kiskuma+V:r˘iidu=k˘isK1 KISKUMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
roogasid=maitsma+V:r˘oogasid=m˘aitsE7 KAITSMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
saastama+V:s˘aasta LAASTAMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
seadusjõudu=andma+V:s˘eadus#j˘õudu=˘anD1A7 NAERMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sekka=puistama+V:s˘ekka=p˘uista TÜÜTAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
silmi=sulgema+V:s˘ilmi=s˘ulG1e SÜTTIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
soiguma+V:s˘oiG1u LEKKIMA  "weight: 10 " ; 
suikuma+V:s˘uiku LEPPIMA  "weight: 10 " ; 
sulgema+V:s˘ulG1e SÜTTIMA  "weight: 6 " ; 
suplema+V:s˘uple HAKKAMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
suupistet=võtma+V:s˘uu#pistet=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sädelema+V:sädele RABELEMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
südant=puistama+V:südant=p˘uista TÜÜTAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
süttima+V:s˘ütti SÜTTIMA  "weight: 8 " ; 
taastama+V:t˘aasta TAOTLEMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
tahkestuma+V:tahkestu ELAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
teatama+V:t˘eata TAOTLEMA  "weight: 5 " ; 
toitma+V:t˘oitA7 SAATMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
uitama+V:˘uita TÜÜTAMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
uskuma+V:˘usK1 USKUMA  "weight: 5 " ; 
vappuma+V:v˘appu SÜTTIMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
vastu=hakkama+V:v˘astu=h˘akka HAKKAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vedelema+V:vedele RABELEMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
veendunult=ütlema+V:v˘eendunult=˘üT1 ÜTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
veenma+V:v˘een VEENMA  "weight: 7 " ; 
viha=kandma+V:viha=k˘anD1A7 NAERMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
viltu=kiskuma+V:v˘iltu=k˘isK1 KISKUMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
välja=võtma+V:v˘älʲja=v˘õT1 KATMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ühte=sattuma+V:˘ühte=s˘attu LEKKIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
üles=kergitama+V:üles=kergita ELAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ümber=mõtlema+V:˘ümber=m˘õT1 ÜTLEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
LEXICON EerVerbs
eksamineerima+V:eksamin˘eeri LEPPIMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
restaureerima+V:restaur˘eeri LEPPIMA  "weight: 10 " ; 
